Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4025
Incorporation of authority.

(1) An agent has authority
described in sections 30-4024 to 30-4040 if the power of attorney refers to
general authority with respect to the descriptive term for the subjects stated
in sections 30-4027 to 30-4040 or cites the section in which the authority
is described.

(2) A reference in a
power of attorney to general authority with respect to the descriptive term
for a subject in sections 30-4027 to 30-4040 or a citation to a section within
such sections incorporates the entire section described or cited as if it
were set out in full in the power of attorney.

(3) A principal may modify authority
incorporated by reference.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 25.